Missouri, session 2026, SB1734.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 311, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 311.083, to read as
follows:
311.083. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Common area", any public area within an
entertainment district and any area of a public right-of-way
that is within the entertainment district. "Common area"
shall not include areas open to the public that are located
within an establishment licensed under this chapter;
(2) "Entertainment district", any area in any county
bordering the Missouri river, and that:
(a) Is located in any city with more than forty-six
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants;
(b) Contains a combination of entertainment venues,
bars, nightclubs, restaurants, and other licensed
establishments and common areas; and
(c) Is designated as such by an ordinance of the
governing body of the city;

SB 1734 2
(3) "Portable bar", any bar, table, kiosk, cart, or
stand that is not a permanent fixture and can be moved from
place to place.
2. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
chapter to the contrary, any person who possesses the
qualifications required under this chapter, and who meets
the requirements of and complies with the provisions of this
chapter, may apply for, and the supervisor of alcohol and
tobacco control may issue, an entertainment district special
license to sell intoxicating liquor by the drink for retail
for consumption dispensed from one or more licensed
establishments including, but not limited to, portable bars
within the entertainment district, until 1:30 a.m. on
Mondays through Saturdays and from 6:00 a.m. on Sundays and
until 1:30 a.m. on Mondays.
3. An applicant granted an entertainment district
special license under this section shall pay a license fee
of three hundred dollars per year.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter
to the contrary, on such days and at such times during the
hours a licensee is allowed under this chapter to sell
alcoholic beverages, licensed establishments holding an
entertainment district special license under this section
may allow persons to leave the licensed premises located in
portions of the entertainment district with an alcoholic
beverage and enter upon and consume the alcoholic beverage
within other licensed establishments and common areas
located in portions of the entertainment district. No
person shall take any alcoholic beverage or alcoholic
beverages outside the boundaries of the entertainment
district.

SB 1734 3
5. Every licensee within the entertainment district
shall serve alcoholic beverages in containers that display
and contain the licensee's trade name or logo or some other
mark that is unique to that license and licensee.
6. The holder of an entertainment district special
license is solely responsible for alcohol violations
occurring on its premises, including any portable bar, and
in any common area.
7. The governing body of the city in which the
entertainment district is located shall be authorized to
adopt by ordinance procedures for approval or rejection of
such entertainment districts as well as rules and
regulations for conduct and enforcement thereof consistent
with this section.
✓